Utah statutes.
57-8a-307.   Action to recover unpaid assessment.

An association need not pursue a judicial foreclosure or nonjudicial foreclosure to collect an unpaid assessment but may file an action to recover a money judgment for the unpaid assessment without waiving the lien under Section 57-8a-301.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

